Nebraska, session 109, LB1030.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1030 LB1030
2026 2026
1 Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $XXX from the General Fund
2 for FY2026-27 to the Department of Economic Development, for Program 601,
3 Community and Rural Development, to provide state aid to development
4 districts formed under sections 13-1901 to 13-1907.
-2-